src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON NUM_ENSIMMÄINEN
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 38
!!€ ensimäinen: ensimäinen+A+Ord+Sg+Nom
!!€ ensimäisenä: ensimäinen+A+Ord+Sg+Ess
!!€ ensimäisessä: ensimäinen+A+Ord+Sg+Ine
!!€ ensimäistä: ensimäinen+A+Ord+Sg+Par
!!€ ensimäisten: ensimäinen+A+Ord+Pl+Gen
!!€ ensimäissiitten: ensimäinen+A+Ord+Pl+Gen
!!€ ensimäissii: ensimäinen+A+Ord+Pl+Par
!!€ ensimäishiin: ensimäinen+A+Ord+Pl+Ill
!!€ ensimäisinä: ensimäinen+A+Ord+Pl+Ess
!!€ ensimäisissä: ensimäinen+A+Ord+Pl+Ine
0:nen   NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEEN    ;
0:se    NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS   ;
0:se    NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:ss    NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:ss    NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IITTEN ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIIN  ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS_N ;
+Der+Der/s:s    R ; !new PoS is missing

LEXICON NUM_TOINEN
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 38 back
!!€ toinen: toinen+A+Ord+Sg+Nom
!!€ toisheen: toinen+A+Ord+Sg+Ill
!!€ toista: toinen+A+Ord+Sg+Par
!!€ toisessa: toinen+A+Ord+Sg+Ine
!!€ toisela: toinen+A+Ord+Sg+Ade
!!€ toisena: toinen+A+Ord+Sg+Ess
!!€ toisten: toinen+A+Ord+Pl+Gen
!!€ toissiin: toinen+A+Ord+Pl+Gen
!!€ toissii: toinen+A+Ord+Pl+Par
!!€ toishiin: toinen+A+Ord+Pl+Ill
!!€ toisissa: toinen+A+Ord+Pl+Ine
!!€ toisina: toinen+A+Ord+Pl+Ess
0:nen   NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEEN    ;
0:se    NUM_BACK_SINGULARS   ;
0:se    NUM_BACK_SINGULARS_L ;
0:se    NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_L ;
0:se    NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_NA ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:ss    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:ss    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IIN   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIIN  ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_N ;
+Der+Der/s:s    R ; !new PoS is missing

LEXICON NUM_KOLMAS
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 45
!!€ kolmas: kolmas+A+Ord+Sg+Nom
!!€ kolmantenna: kolmas+A+Ord+Sg+Ess
!!€ kolmanessa: kolmas+A+Ord+Sg+Ine
!!€ kolmanella: kolmas+A+Ord+Sg+Ade
!!€ kolmantheen: kolmas+A+Ord+Sg+Ill
!!€ kolmatta: kolmas+A+Ord+Sg+Par
!!€ kolmanssii: kolmas+A+Ord+Pl+Par
!!€ kolmanssiitten: kolmas+A+Ord+Pl+Gen
!!€ kolmansissa: kolmas+A+Ord+Pl+Ine
!!€ kolmansinna: kolmas+A+Ord+Pl+Ess
0:s     NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:nt    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEEN    ;
0:nte   NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:nte   NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_NNA ;
0:ne    NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
0:ne    NUM_BACK_SINGULARS_LL ;
0:ne    NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_LL ;
0:t     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:nss   NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:nss   NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IITTEN   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_NN ;

LEXICON NUM_NELJÄS
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
!!€gt-norm: Numerals 45 fron
!!€ neljes: neljes+A+Ord+Sg+Nom
!!€ neljentheen: neljes+A+Ord+Sg+Ill
!!€ neljentennä: neljes+A+Ord+Sg+Ess
!!€ neljenessä: neljes+A+Ord+Sg+Ine
!!€ neljenellä: neljes+A+Ord+Sg+Ade
!!€ neljettä: neljes+A+Ord+Sg+Par
!!€ neljenssii: neljes+A+Ord+Pl+Par
!!€ neljenssiitten: neljes+A+Ord+Pl+Gen
!!€ neljenshiin: neljes+A+Ord+Pl+Ill
!!€ neljensissä: neljes+A+Ord+Pl+Ine
!!€ neljensinnä: neljes+A+Ord+Pl+Ess
0:s     NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:nt    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEEN    ;
0:nte   NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:nte   NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS_NNA ;
0:ne    NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:ne    NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS_LL ;
0:ne    NUM_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS_LL ;
0:t     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0:nss   NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_II   ;
0:nss   NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IITTEN   ;
0:ns    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIIN  ;
0:ns    NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0:ns    NUM_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS_NN ;




LEXICON ARABICCOMPOUNDS   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ! arabic as first part, 
! :-  NAMAT ;            ! 10-jienat, etc. NAMAT derivs are
                    ! treated as compounds and excluded from the nonrec
                    ! variants, otherwise the PLX lexicon size explodes
!+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-»»# SASCont ; !6-jahkásaš
+Use/NG: RHyph ; ! 3-

LEXICON NUM_ORD_ALL
ensimäinen+A+Ord:ensimäi    NUM_ENSIMMÄINEN ;
yhes+A+Ord:yhe              NUM_NELJÄS ;
toinen+A+Ord:toi              NUM_TOINEN ;
kahes+A+Ord:kahe            NUM_KOLMAS ;
kolmas+A+Ord:kolma            NUM_KOLMAS ;
neljes+A+Ord:nelje            NUM_NELJÄS ;
viies+A+Ord:viie            NUM_NELJÄS ;
kuues+A+Ord:kuue            NUM_KOLMAS ;
seittemäs+A+Ord:seittemä      NUM_NELJÄS ;
kahekses+A+Ord:kahekse      NUM_KOLMAS ;
yhekses+A+Ord:yhekse        NUM_NELJÄS ;
kymmenes+A+Ord:kymmene        NUM_NELJÄS ;
saas+A+Ord:saa              NUM_KOLMAS ;
tuhanes+A+Ord:tuhane        NUM_KOLMAS ;
miljoonas+A+Ord:miljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
miljardis+A+Ord:miljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
biljoonas+A+Ord:biljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
biljardis+A+Ord:biljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
triljoonas+A+Ord:triljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
triljardis+A+Ord:triljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
kvadriljoonas+A+Ord:kvadriljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
kvadriljardis+A+Ord:kvadriljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
kvintiljoonas+A+Ord:kvintiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
kvintiljardis+A+Ord:kvintiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
sekstiljoonas+A+Ord:sekstiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
sekstiljardis+A+Ord:sekstiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
oktiljoonas+A+Ord:oktiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
oktiljardis+A+Ord:oktiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
noviljoonas+A+Ord:noviljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
noviljardis+A+Ord:noviljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
undekiljoonas+A+Ord:undekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
undekiljardis+A+Ord:undekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
duodekiljoonas+A+Ord:duodekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
duodekiljardis+A+Ord:duodekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
tredekiljoonas+A+Ord:tredekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
tredekiljardis+A+Ord:tredekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
kvattuordekiljoonas+A+Ord:kvattuordekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
kvattuordekiljardis+A+Ord:kvattuordekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
kvindekiljoonas+A+Ord:kvindekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
kvindekiljardis+A+Ord:kvindekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
sedekiljoonas+A+Ord:sedekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
sedekiljardis+A+Ord:sedekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
septendekiljoonas+A+Ord:septendekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
septendekiljardis+A+Ord:septendekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
oktodekiljoonas+A+Ord:oktodekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
oktodekiljardis+A+Ord:oktodekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
novemdekiljoonas+A+Ord:novemdekiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
novemdekiljardis+A+Ord:novemdekiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
vidingtiljoonas+A+Ord:vidingtiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
vidingtiljardis+A+Ord:vidingtiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
tridingtiljoonas+A+Ord:tridingtiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
tridingtiljardis+A+Ord:tridingtiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
sentiljoonas+A+Ord:sentiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
sentiljardis+A+Ord:sentiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
kiljoonas+A+Ord:kiljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
kiljardis+A+Ord:kiljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
piljoonas+A+Ord:piljoona  NUM_KOLMAS ;
piljardis+A+Ord:piljardi  NUM_KOLMAS   ;
